District of Columbia statutes.
37-112

Insurance.

(a)

The market manager shall maintain appropriate liability insurance. The market manager shall require each tenant and market vendor to maintain liability insurance, individually or as part of a group policy.

(b)

The market manager, each tenant and each market vendor shall indemnify and hold harmless the District of Columbia from any liability arising out of each tenant’s or market vendor’s and market manager’s respective activity.

Apr. 16, 1999, D.C. Law 12-228, § 13, 46 DCR 1066
1981 Ed., § 10-312.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(d) of Eastern Market Emergency Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-570, November 7, 2008, 55 DCR 12114).